Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.906

Hazing—Report of violations.

(1) Beginning with the 2022-23 academic year, each public and private institution of higher education shall maintain and publicly report actual findings of violations by any student organization, athletic team, or living group of the public or private institution of higher education's code of conduct, antihazing policies, or state or federal laws relating to hazing or offenses related to alcohol, drugs, sexual assault, or physical assault.

(2) The report shall include the following:

(a) The name of the student organization, athletic team, or living group;

(b) The date the investigation was initiated;

(c) The date on which the investigation ended with a finding that a violation occurred;

(d) A description of the incident or incidents, including the date of the initial violation, and the violations, findings, and sanctions placed on the student organization, athletic team, or living group;

(e) The details of the sanction or sanctions imposed, including the beginning and end dates of the sanction or sanctions; and

(f) The date the student organization, athletic team, or living group was charged with a violation.

(3) Investigations that do not result in a finding of formal violations of the student code of conduct or state or federal law shall not be included in the report. The report shall not include any personal or identifying information of individual student members and shall be subject to the requirements of the federal family education rights and privacy act of 1974, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g.

(4) Public and private institutions of higher education shall make reports under this section available on their websites in a prominent location clearly labeled and easily accessible from the institution's website.

(5) Each public and private institution of higher education shall maintain reports as they are updated for five years and shall post them on their respective websites at least 45 calendar days before the start of each fall academic term and at least 10 days before the start of all other academic terms.

[ 2022 c 209 s 4.]

NOTES:

Short title—2022 c 209: See note following RCW 28B.10.900.